Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-397
Forms and electronic systems to allow filings.

The director may prescribe the appropriate forms and implement the appropriate electronic systems to allow filings with the division pursuant to the unified carrier registration plan and agreement.

Laws 2007, LB358, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 22.